Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds,  federal funds and funds described in sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act,
collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for the following purposes:
(1) Common School Fund
programs................................... $ 59,265,951
(2) South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve operations.................... $ 4,039,329
(3) Elliott State Research Forest ... $ 12,086,084
(4) Capital improvements ............... $ 596,145
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,019,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of State Lands from the Portland  Harbor Cleanup
Fund established by ORS 274.064.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $213,600
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Department of State Lands from the Submerged Lands  Enhancement
Fund established by ORS 274.388.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,282,425 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of  State Lands from the Oregon Removal-Fill Miti-
gation Fund established by ORS 196.640.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $250,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Department of State Lands from the Oregon Ocean Science Fund estab-
lished by ORS 196.567.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$11,151,895 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  by the Department of State Lands from the Oregon Abandoned and
Derelict Vessel Fund established by ORS 274.371.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Lands for
the following purposes:
(1) South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve operations.................... $ 4,325,973
(2) Common School Fund
programs................................... $ 116,945
SECTION 8.
For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by the Department
of State Lands for  tenant-incurred utility charges and State Treasurer charges for
investment-related transactions are not limited.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 2